District of Columbia statutes.
1-608.54

Appointment of attorneys.

(a)

Attorneys employed by the Office of the Attorney General shall be hired by the Attorney General. Attorneys employed by subordinate agencies shall be hired by the subordinate agency heads after consultation with the Director of the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel. Attorneys employed by the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel shall be hired by the Director of the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel.

(b)

Attorneys employed by an independent agency shall be hired by the head of the agency or the Senior Executive Attorney designee.

(c)

Legal Service attorneys may be hired noncompetitively.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 854
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-260, § 2(j), 46 DCR 1318
Apr. 12, 2000. D.C. Law 13-91, § 110(c), 47 DCR 520
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 3012(d), 52 DCR 7503
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-60, § 101(d), 60 DCR 15487
1981 Ed., § 1-609.54.
D.C. Law 13-91, in subsec. (b), added “or the Senior Executive Attorney designee”; and added subsec. (c).
D.C. Law 16-33 rewrote subsec. (a), which had read as follows: “(a) Attorneys employed by the Office of the Corporation Counsel, wherever located in the District government, shall be hired by the Corporation Counsel. Attorneys, including Senior Executive Attorneys, employed by any other subordinate agency shall be hired by the head of the agency with the approval of the Corporation Counsel.”
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-60 rewrote (a).
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 1-608.51.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Legal Services Clarification and Technical Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-203, December 8, 1999, 46 DCR 10456).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Legal Services Clarification and Technical Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-293, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2063).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3012(d) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, Jan. 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-155, § 1014(c), see § 7002 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 401(a) of D.C. Law 20-60 provided that § 101 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 1013 of D.C. Law 20-155 amended D.C. Law 20-60 to provide that D.C. Law 20-60, §  101, shall apply as of October 1, 2018; Section 1014(b) of D.C. Law 20-155 amended D.C. Law 20-60 to provide that D.C. Law 20-60, §  101, shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-155: Section 1014(c) of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that § 1014 of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7002 of D.C. Law 21-36 repealed D.C. Law 20-155, §  1014(c).